Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6841YC (2) 91 ms/md H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 441.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 441.9 Removal of assessor. 3 The assessor may be removed by a majority vote of the 4 conference board, after charges of misconduct, nonfeasance, 5 malfeasance, or misfeasance in office , charges of failing to 6 meet applicable employment standards, or charges of unethical 7 or unlawful conduct are substantiated at a public hearing, if a 8 hearing is demanded by the assessor by written notice served 9 upon the chairperson of the conference board. For purposes 10 of this section , âmisconductâ includes but is not limited to 11 knowingly engaging in assessment methods, practices, or conduct 12 that contravene any applicable law, administrative rule, or 13 order of any court or other government authority. 14 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 15 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 16